Nevada, session 83, AB116.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 597.7635 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
597.7635 1. A food delivery service platform provider shall
not facilitate an online food order involving a food dispensing
establishment, including, without limitation, arranging for the same-
day delivery or same-day pickup of food prepared by a food
dispensing establishment, unless [the] :
(a) The food dispensing establishment has obtained any
business license required by the local government in which the
food dispensing establishment is located which authorizes the food
dispensing establishment to conduct business at the address at
which the food dispensing establishment prepares the online food
order; and
(b) The food delivery service platform provider has entered into
a written agreement with the food dispensing establishment that
expressly authorizes the food delivery service platform provider to
engage in such activities.
2. A food dispensing establishment shall not accept an online
food order facilitated by a food delivery service platform provider
unless the food dispensing establishment has obtained any
business license required by the local government in which the
food dispensing establishment is located which authorizes the food
dispensing establishment to conduct business at the address at
which the food dispensing establishment prepares the online food
order. A food dispensing establishment who violates this
subsection or provides to the food delivery service platform
provider false or misleading information regarding the business
license of the food dispensing establishment is subject to a civil
penalty not to exceed $100 for each online food order which the
food dispensing establishment fills in violation of this subsection.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
3. A food delivery service platform provider who receives
specific, verifiable information that a food dispensing
establishment has violated subsection 2 or has provided to the food
delivery service platform provider false or misleading information
regarding the business license of the food dispensing
establishment shall, not later than 10 days after receiving that
information, remove the food dispensing establishment from the
food delivery service platform of the food delivery service platform
provider. A food delivery service platform provider who violates
the provisions of this subsection is subject to a civil penalty not to
exceed $500 for each day that the food dispensing establishment
remains on the food delivery service platform of the food delivery
service platform provider after the 10th day after the food delivery
service platform provider receives the information described in
subsection 3.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)